src/fst/guesser.lexc
! Guesser needs these
Letter = a|e|i|o|u|õ|ä|ö|ü|b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|š|z|ž|t|v|w|x|y; 
!AnySymbol = Letter | CapLetter | Dig ;  ! punctuation symbols missing from here; is it OK?

! double vowels and diphtongs:
!
!   ii    iu         üü üi                                    ui    uu
!   ei ee eu eo ea   öö öi öe    öa       õõ õi õe õu õo      oi oe ou oo oa
!                    ää äi äe äu                              ai ae au ao aa
!
VowNoDots = i|u|a|e|o;
VowDots = [ õ|ä|ö|ü ];
Vowel = [ VowNoDots | VowDots ] | y | w ;
DoubleVow = i^2 | u^2 | a^2 | e^2 | o^2 | õ^2 | ä^2 | ö^2 | ü^2 ;
Diphtong = [Vowel VowNoDots] & ~[HighVowel NonHighVowel] & ~DoubleVow & ~[ä a] & ~[ö o] & ~[ü u];  ! y and w in diphtongs is weird... 

JVow = [i [VowNoDots - i]];   ! ia, ie, iu, io; iu=ju; io=jo , v.a. viimases jalas lühikese rõhulise silbi järel (minia, venia)
EVow = [[e [VowNoDots - i]] & ~[e^2]];   ! eu=e_u; eo=e_o; ea=e_a lühikese? rõhulise silbi järel, s.t. kahe OrdFoot vahel või ... vahel...
UVow = [[u [VowNoDots - i]] & ~[u^2]];   ! uo, ua, ue - esimeses silbis diftong, mujal kaks eraldi vokaali

StrictDiphtong = [Diphtong & ~[JVow] & ~[UVow] & ~[EVow]] ; ! ei saa olla muud kui diftong, s.t. tema keskel ei saa olla silbipiiri 
LongV =  [DoubleVow | Diphtong] ;

Ckpt = k|p|t;
DoubleCkpt = k^2 | p^2 | t^2 ;
Clmnr = l|m|n|r;
DoubleClmnr = l^2 | m^2 | n^2 | r^2 ;
Cgbd = g|b|d;
Cfš = f|š;
Csibilant = [s|š|z|ž];
Cnonsonor = [Ckpt | Cgbd | Cfš | h | s ] ;
Consonant = Cnonsonor | Clmnr | j | v | c|q|z|ž|w|x|y;
ShortCons = [Cgbd | Clmnr | h | j | s | v] ;

DoubleCons = DoubleCkpt | DoubleClmnr | f^2 | h^2 | s^2 | š^2 | v^2   ;

Letter = Vowel | Consonant ;

! a syllable pair
! uba, puänt, laua, liaan
Pair = [[Vowel+ Consonant+ Vowel+] | 
       [[Vowel Vowel] & ~LongV] |                
       [[LongV Vowel] & ~[Vowel DoubleVow]] |    
       [[Vowel DoubleVow] & ~[LongV Vowel]]];     

! Syllables
ShortVSyll = Vowel ;
ShortCSyll = [[Vowel | JVow | UVow] [Consonant | [Cgbd Clmnr]]] ;
LongCSyll =  [[Vowel | JVow | UVow] [[Consonant Consonant+] & ~[Cgbd Clmnr]]] ;
LCSyll =     [LongCSyll & ~[Letter* [DoubleCons | [Clmnr s s]]]] ;
XCSyll =     [LongCSyll &  [Letter* [DoubleCons | [Clmnr s s]]]] ;  ! xtra long...


! word syllable count starts from the last stressed syllable:
! it may be the first syllable of the word, or the last one with long vowel
FirstSyll = [Consonant* [ShortCSyll | ShortVSyll]] | [Letter* LongCSyll] | 
            [[[Letter* DoubleVow] | [[Letter* Diphtong] & ~[Letter* [DoubleVow | StrictDiphtong] Vowel]]] Consonant*] ;

! longish first syllable
LFirstSyll = [Consonant* LongCSyll] | [Letter* XCSyll] | 
             [[[Letter* DoubleVow] | [[Letter* Diphtong] & ~[Letter* [DoubleVow | StrictDiphtong] Vowel]]] Consonant*] ;

! foot is a recurring building block for patterns
badinfoot = [Consonant* [LongV | JVow | UVow] Consonant*] | [Letter* DoubleVow Consonant*];
Foot  = [FirstSyll  [ShortVSyll | ShortCSyll | LCSyll]] & ~[badinfoot] ;
LFoot = [LFirstSyll [ShortVSyll | ShortCSyll | LCSyll]] & ~[badinfoot] ;  ! foot starts with a longish syllable


! three syllable sequence
ThreeSyllV = [Foot Vowel] & ~[Letter* [DoubleVow | StrictDiphtong]] ;

! lauatu, mitte ideetu, aga ka nimetatu (võiks olla paradigm deriv);  ideetu, aga ka tuutu
DerTu = [[Letter* Pair t u] |   
         [Letter* LongV t u] ];                         
DerJa = [[Letter* Vowel Consonant+ Vowel j a] | [Letter* Vowel Consonant+ t j a]];
DerNe = [[Letter* Pair (Consonant) n e] | [Letter* Vowel [Vowel | Consonant] Consonant+ n e]];
DerKe = [Letter* Pair k e] ;

! patterns for productive inflectional types
! prefix Proto denotes ordinary words, Nimi denotes names

! video, rodeo, stereo also like ARMEE
ProtoARMEE = [FirstSyll & [Letter* Vowel]] | [Consonant* [JVow | UVow]];

NimiARMEE = [Letter* [Vowel]] ;

ProtoKAVA = [[Consonant* Vowel ShortCons [VowNoDots - e]] |
                  [Foot [t | [s t] | [s k]] e l u]] ;
!nimiKAVA is unnecessary

SyllAASTA = [[ThreeSyllV & [Letter* VowNoDots]] & ~DerKe] ;

! viimane on ka ThreeSyll, aga EndAASTA on mugav ; tegelinski
EndAASTA = [[Letter* Vowel Consonant+ i a] |   
           [Letter* Vowel Consonant+ i k a] | 
           [Letter* Vowel Consonant+ s k i]] ;                                       

            
! tüüne, haige, rohke, raske, range,  lükra , kalme, võimla, Brodski, mitte katte ega veski
! need ei tohiks olla AASTA tüüpi
BadGradeAASTA = [Consonant* Vowel [Consonant | [Cgbd Clmnr]] VowNoDots] | 
                     [Consonant* Vowel Consonant Csibilant [VowNoDots - e]] | 
                     [Letter* Vowel DoubleClmnr  [VowNoDots - e]] ;

GradeAASTA = [Foot & [Letter* Vowel+ Consonant+ VowNoDots] & ~BadGradeAASTA] ;

AASTA = [SyllAASTA | EndAASTA | GradeAASTA] ;  ! DerJa tuleks verbi tuletisena nagunii, eks?

ProtoAASTA = [AASTA & ~DerNe] | DerTu | DerJa ;

! kui iganes mahub piisavalt silpe, siis ongi AASTA tüüp...
NimiAASTA = [Letter* AASTA] ;

! need justkui ei tohiks olla PERE tüüpi (on ainult AASTA tüüpi)
BadGradePere = [[Letter* LongV Consonant Consonant Consonant+ Vowel] |
                     [Letter* Csibilant Consonant Consonant+ Vowel] |
                     [Letter* Consonant+ Cgbd Clmnr Vowel] 
                    ] ;

GradePERE = [Foot & [[Letter* Vowel+ Consonant+ Vowel] & ~BadGradePere ]] ;

SyllPERE = [[Letter* Vowel] & ~ProtoARMEE & ~AASTA] | [Consonant* JVow];

VoorPERE = [Letter* Letter Consonant Vowel Vowel [k|n] e] ; ! karaoke, lantsaroone

ProtoPERE = [[SyllPERE | [SyllAASTA & ~EndAASTA]] & ~DerJa  & ~DerTu & ~DerKe & ~DerNe] | [GradePERE & ~DerNe] | VoorPERE ;
! eefeu, panatsea jms kuuluvad ka PERE alla, ehkki tegelt samad vormid saaks ARMEE + AASTA kaudu...

! almost anything is possible... e.g. Sydney, Maria, Tanganjika
NimiPERE =  [Letter* Letter Vowel] & ~[FirstSyll & [Letter* Vowel]];

ProtoPEENIKE = DerKe ;
!NimiPEENIKE is unnecessary ?

DerLine = [l i n e] ;
DerLane = [l a n e] ;
DerMine = [m i n e];
DerLiLaMiNe = DerLine | DerLane | DerMine;

AnyOLULINE = [Letter* Vowel Consonant+ [a|e|i|u] n e] | [[Foot & [Letter* Vowel]] n e] ;  ! ka laiune
AnyOLULIS =  [Letter* Vowel Consonant+ VowNoDots s] | [[Foot & [Letter* [i|u]]] s] | [[Foot & [Letter* [Vowel - u]]] u s] | [[Letter* Pair Vowel s] & [Letter* [JVow | EVow | UVow] s]];  ! ka laius, avaus; 

! these patterns can never occur for OLULINE
SyllSOOLANE = [Consonant* [ShortCSyll & [Vowel Consonant+]] VowNoDots n e] ;                 ! tinane, rublane, mitte kiuline
SyllSOOLAS =  [Consonant* [ShortCSyll & [Vowel Consonant+]] VowNoDots s] | [Consonant* Vowel+ Consonant+ i s];                 ! jänes, Valdis 

EndSOOLANE = [Letter* Vowel [Vowel | Consonant+] n e] & ~[Consonant* Vowel [Consonant - [Ckpt | m]] n e] ;  ! jäine, ...aarne, ...stne, ka akne ja tamne; laiune

! ProtoOLULIS: selle mustriga sõnad võivad olla pl par lõpus -si;
ProtoOLULIS = [AnyOLULIS & ~SyllSOOLAS] ;

NimiOLULIS = [ProtoOLULIS] ;

ProtoOLULINE = [ AnyOLULINE & ~[SyllSOOLANE | EndSOOLANE]] ;  ! ei tunne laiune, sest selle tunneb (valesti) EndSOOLANE

NimiOLULINE = [ProtoOLULINE] ;

! soolane: kõik ne, s lõpulised on siin 
ProtoSOOLAS = [Letter* Pair s] & ~[Letter* [DoubleVow | StrictDiphtong] s] ; ! ei tunne: päis, teos jts 1-silbilised

NimiSOOLAS = [ProtoSOOLAS] ;

ProtoSOOLANE = [Letter* Letter Letter Letter n e] ; ! ei tunne: upne, öine; 

NimiSOOLANE = [ProtoSOOLANE] ;

SyllMUUSEUM = [Letter* Vowel [Vowel | Consonant+] Consonant [JVow | EVow] Clmnr] |
                   [Letter* Vowel Cfš [JVow | EVow] Clmnr];        ! kahtlane: liineal (aga ok: ookean)
ProtoMUUSEUM = SyllMUUSEUM ;

NimiMUUSEUM = [ProtoMUUSEUM] ;

SyllELANIK = [Foot Consonant i k] ;   

! võiks ka nii:
! need ei tohiks olla ELANIK tüüpi
! valesti: kümnik; ...eerik, ... aga ka (valesti) nt suumik, soo+lik
BadGradeELANIK = [Consonant* Vowel [Consonant | [Cgbd Clmnr]] i k] | 
                      [Consonant* Vowel Consonant Csibilant i k] | 
                      [(Letter* Consonant) Consonant* Vowel DoubleClmnr i k] |
                      [Consonant* Vowel ShortCons [ShortCons - [l|m]] i k] |   
                      [Letter* DoubleVow Consonant i k] |                            
                      [Letter* Diphtong [Consonant - Clmnr] i k];           

! kaks silpi, kolmas välde
GradeELANIK = [Foot & [Letter* Vowel+ Consonant+ i k] & ~BadGradeELANIK] ;

EndELANIK =    [Letter* Pair Consonant* l i k] | [Letter* LongV l i k ] ;  ! ...tuslik, ealik, hoolik, dulcinealik...

!ei tunne: kümnik, suumik
ProtoELANIK = [SyllELANIK | GradeELANIK | EndELANIK];

NimiELANIK = [ProtoELANIK] ;

SyllVIRSIK = [Foot] & [Letter* [[a | e | i] [k | [n g] | [r g]]]] ;

EndVIRSIK = [Letter* Consonant^2 i k] | [Letter* Vowel t i k] ;

BadVirsik = [Letter* Vowel Consonant+ Vowel (s) l i k] | [Letter* b e r g];
ProtoVIRSIK = [SyllVIRSIK | EndVIRSIK] & ~BadVirsik; ! ei tunne: kürenaik, paranoik, stoik

NimiVIRSIK = [ProtoVIRSIK] | [Letter* Vowel Consonant+ i c (k) ] ; ! ka Titanic, Eric

! ka seviot ja patriot

SyllKABINET = [ThreeSyllV Ckpt] & [[Letter* Consonant Vowel Ckpt] | [Letter* [[Vowel Vowel] & ~LongV] Ckpt] ];
BadEndKABINET = [Letter* i k];

! puuslak, kotlet, s.t. 2-silbilised
ThirdGradeKABINET = [[[Consonant* [LongV | [Vowel+ Consonant* Ckpt]] Consonant* Vowel Ckpt]] & [?* Consonant Consonant Vowel Ckpt]];

ProtoKABINET = [[SyllKABINET | ThirdGradeKABINET] & ~BadEndKABINET] | [Consonant* Vowel Ckpt];
! mitte_kabinet hulka kuulub palju valesid, aga kabinet alla ei kuulu nt tuk-tuk...

NimiKABINET = [ProtoKABINET] ;

SyllMAGUS = [Consonant* Vowel ShortCons i n] | [Consonant* Vowel ([Vowel | Consonant]) Consonant i t s];  ! sabin, koorits nagu KAVA ja PERE...
ProtoMAGUS = [SyllMAGUS] ;

NimiMAGUS = ProtoMAGUS ;

ProtoLOHAKAS = [[Letter* Letter Vowel k a s] | [Letter* Letter Letter j a s]] & ~[Consonant* Vowel [j|k] a s];

! polegi vaja 
!NimiLOHAKAS = [ProtoLOHAKAS] ;

SyllREDEL = [Letter* Consonant] & [[Letter* Foot] | [Consonant* JVow Consonant+]] & ~BadEndKABINET & ~[Letter* Consonant Vowel s] & ~ProtoMUUSEUM ;

EndREDEL =  [Letter* Vowel Consonant Consonant+ e [l|r]] | [Letter* Vowel Consonant* Cnonsonor [l|r]];  ! minister, Dnestr, Panagl
AlsoREDEL = [Consonant* Vowel+ [[[Consonant - l] l] | [[Consonant - r] r]]] |
                 [Consonant* Vowel Vowel [n|r] d]; !  kreml, loend

ProtoREDEL = [SyllREDEL | EndREDEL | AlsoREDEL] ;

NimiREDEL = [ProtoREDEL] | [Letter* Vowel [Vowel | Clmnr] s k];  ! ka Tomsk, Baltiisk; ei tunne Stuart ega Sinead

SyllTAUD = [Letter* Consonant] & ~[Letter* Vowel Consonant+ Vowel s] & ~[Letter* Vowel Consonant+ JVow s] & ~[Letter* Consonant Vowel Ckpt] &
                ~[Letter* LongV Consonant+ Vowel ShortCons]  & ~ProtoMUUSEUM & ~[Letter* k o n d];
AlsoTAUD = [Consonant* Vowel+ Consonant Vowel [[l l] | [s s]] Vowel Clmnr] ;  ! emissar, patisson, leveller

ProtoTAUD = [SyllTAUD | AlsoTAUD] ;

NimiTAUD = [ProtoTAUD] | [Letter* Vowel g r a d] ;  ! ka Beograd

!----
! verbs

RABELEMA = [Consonant* Vowel Consonant+ e l e ] ;
HAKKLE = [[[Foot & [Letter* Consonant l e]] ] & ~[Foot l e ]] ; 
HAKKA =  [[[LFoot & [Letter* a]] ] & ~[Foot a ]];

HAKKAMA = [HAKKLE | HAKKA] ;

LEPPI = [[[LFoot & [Letter* i]] ] & ~[Foot i ]] | [[Foot & [Letter* Clmnr Ckpt i]] ] ;
LEPPU = [Consonant* Vowel Clmnr Ckpt u ] | 
             [Consonant* LongV Ckpt u ] | 
             [Consonant* Vowel DoubleCkpt u ]; ! alati ka ELAMA; nähtava orto muutuseta on siit väljas...
LEPPIMA = [LEPPI | LEPPU] ;

ELAMA = [Letter* Letter Letter Vowel ] & ~[RABELEMA] & ~[LEPPI] & ~[HAKKLE];

!----
ProtoKOND = [Letter* Letter Letter k o n ] ; ! d:"D1"  kond-derivation hack
ProtoAPO = [Letter* Letter] ; ! word pronunciation is not deducible from its letters (e.g. Braille is brai)

!Word = [Letter+] ;
!Name = [CapLetter Letter+] ;


! This guesser lexicon turned into a transcuder is later union-ed with the transducer of simplex words.
! They are tied to each other via flag diacritics.
